California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 426.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Board of Parking Place Commissioners [31770. - 31792.]

31770.

Immediately upon the acquisition of the parking places pursuant to the petition for the formation of the district, a parking place commission shall be appointed. In the discretion of the legislative body, the commission may be appointed at any time prior to such acquisition and after the adoption of the ordinance declaring the district formed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

31770.1.

At its discretion, the legislative body of any city may, by ordinance, provide for the appointment, removal, qualifications, terms of office and number of members of parking place commissioners for such city. Such board shall have all of the powers and duties of parking place commissioners appointed under this part. Such board, so appointed, may be an existing board created by city charter or ordinance or a new board created by ordinance. Such board may act for all vehicle parking districts established within the city under this part or for such of the districts as may be specified in the ordinance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 177.)
-------------------------------------------

31771.

The commission may consist of three or five members.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 487.)
-------------------------------------------

31772.

Members of the commission shall serve without compensation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

31773.

In the case of a city, members of the commission shall be appointed by the mayor, subject to confirmation by the legislative body. In the case of a county they shall be appointed by the legislative body.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

31774.

The commissioners shall hold office for the term of three years from the date of their appointment and qualification and until their successors are appointed and qualified, except that members of the first board appointed shall classify themselves by lot so that one member holds office for one year, one for two years, and one for three years, and, in each instance, until a successor has been appointed and qualified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

31775.

A commissioner may be removed by a four-fifths vote of the legislative body at any time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

31776.

Commissioners shall be persons of business experience and ability, to the end that the affairs of the district shall be administered in the interests of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------

31777.

A commissioner may be an owner or lessee of property, or an officer, employee, or agent of a corporation owning or leasing property, within the district or, in the case of a commission appointed under Section 31865, within one of the districts, or any other qualified person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 177.)
-------------------------------------------

31778.

Whenever a petition signed by the owners of more than one-half of the area of assessable land within the district requesting the removal of a commissioner is filed with the legislative body, it shall immediately remove him and appoint a new commissioner. The commissioner removed is ineligible to hold office as a commissioner of the district for one year following his removal. To secure the removal of a commissioner from a commission appointed under Section 31865, the petition shall be signed by the owners of more than one-half of the area of assessable land within each of a majority of the districts governed by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

31779.

The board of commissioners shall have possession and complete charge, supervision and control of all parking places:

(a) Acquired, constructed, and paid for, or to be paid for, by taxes upon land or real property or assessments upon land in the district.

(b) Acquired or constructed for the use or benefit of the district and paid for in any other manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

31780.

The board shall operate, manage, and control the parking places and make and enforce all necessary regulations for their use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

31781.

The board may fix, regulate, and collect rentals, fees, or charges for the parking of vehicles in parking places under its control, and may provide different rates for different classes of customers or users.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 426.)
-------------------------------------------

31782.

The providing of adequate public parking places in cities may require the use of assessment districts as authorized by Section 31519. Such districts will be created and will be successful only if so operated as to serve adequately the property within the district. It is the intent of this part that the owners of real property in an assessment district created pursuant to Section 31519 to provide parking places to solve the parking problems of the district may receive preferential rates, charges, or rentals for themselves, their tenants, and the classes of persons who call upon or do business with them, all to the end that the property which bears the burden and provides a solution for the parking problem shall receive a special benefit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 426.)
-------------------------------------------

31783.

All parking places acquired and constructed pursuant to this part are public parking places, but the board of commissioners may restrict or partially restrict their use to owners and tenants of real property in the district, and classes of persons designated by such owners or their tenants, and may establish rates, charges, or rentals for the owners and tenants of such properties and classes of persons designated by the owners or tenants which differ from and are less than the rates, charges, or rentals charged other persons.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

31784.

Rentals, fees, and charges shall be fixed after public hearing following such notice as the board of commissioners prescribes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

31784.1.

The board may, if it so desires, operate the parking places, or any thereof, as free public parking places without fee or charge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 202.)
-------------------------------------------

31785.

The board shall appoint in the same manner as other city employees are selected, such employees as it deems necessary. The number of such employees and their salaries shall be determined by the legislative body unless, by ordinance, which may be adopted or repealed at any time, the power to make such determination is granted to the board. Any salary or wage so fixed shall in each instance be at least equal to the prevailing salary or wage for the same quality of services rendered to private persons, firms or corporations in the city under similar employment, in case such prevailing salary or wage can be ascertained.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 434.)
-------------------------------------------

31786.

In the exercise of its power to operate, manage, and control parking places, the board may lease any or all parking places to any person for the sole purpose of the operation of public parking facilities on them by such person, or may grant a franchise, or make a contract with any person for such purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

31787.

The consideration to be paid by the operator for any lease or franchise or under any contract may be a fixed sum or a percentage of gross rentals, fees, or charges collected by the operator, or any other consideration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

31788.

The maximum rentals, fees, and charges to be collected by the operator shall be fixed by the board after public hearing following such notice as the board prescribes, and shall be recited in the lease or franchise. No higher rentals, fees, or charges shall be collected by the operator without amendment of the lease or franchise agreed to by the board after like public hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

31789.

An operator shall not conduct any business other than that of the operation of public parking facilities on any parking place of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

31790.

Any lease or franchise may provide that the use of the parking places shall be restricted, or partially restricted, to owners and tenants of real property in the district, and classes of persons designated by them, and may provide for maximum rates, charges, or rentals for such persons which differ from and are less than the maximum rates, charges, or rentals charged other persons.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

31791.

To expedite the conduct of proceedings and the making of any acquisition or improvement authorized by this part, the legislative body may, at any time prior to the appointment of a board of parking place commissioners, enter into a contract or lease with any owner or tenant of property in the proposed assessment district under which the owner or tenant, for a specified rental or other consideration and for a specified period not exceeding 20 years, reserves a reasonable proportion or number of parking spaces in a parking place of the district for the use of the owner or tenant of such property, the employees of the owner or tenant performing services on the property, and the customers of, or other classes of persons designated by, the owner or tenant and entering the property as invitees or otherwise. After the appointment of a board of parking place commissioners, the board may make such contracts or leases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 426.)
-------------------------------------------

31792.

After the appointment of the board of parking place commissioners, any improvement of any parking place under its charge shall be made by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 426.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Taxation [31820. - 31830.]

31820.

Annually on or before June 30th, the board shall prepare an estimate of the expenditures required for the maintenance, operation, repair, and improvement of the parking places under its charge for the ensuing fiscal year, and required during that year for the acquisition of additional parking places, if any.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

31821.

The board shall also estimate the amount of revenues to be derived from rentals, fees, or charges for the use of the parking places and the amount, if any, to be raised by taxation. The amount to be raised by taxation for the acquisition of additional parking places shall be stated separately.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

31822.

The estimate shall be filed with the legislative body, and at the time and in the manner for levying general taxes, the legislative body shall levy and collect upon and against all of the taxable land and improvements within the district a special ad valorem tax sufficient to raise the sum of money estimated as required to be raised by taxation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

31823.

The tax levy for maintenance, operation, repair, and improvement of parking places in any year shall not exceed fifteen cents ($0.15) on each one hundred dollars ($100) assessed value of taxable land and improvements within the district. The tax levy for acquisition of additional parking places in any year shall not exceed twenty-five cents ($0.25) on each one hundred dollars ($100) assessed value of taxable land and improvements within the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 160.)
-------------------------------------------

31824.

The special tax shall be levied and collected at the same time, in the same manner, by the same officers, and with the same interest and penalties as general taxes levied by the legislative body.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

31825.

The proceeds of the tax levied for maintenance, operation, repair, and improvement shall be placed in the district maintenance and operation fund and expended only for the maintenance, operation, repair, and improvement of parking places under the control of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

31826.

The proceeds of the tax levied for the acquisition of parking places shall be placed in a separate fund of the district and shall be expended only for the purpose for which it was levied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

31827.

All revenues from fees, charges, or rentals for the use of any parking place of the district shall be turned over to the treasurer and by him placed in such fund as the board designates, and may be used for the acquisition, improvement, maintenance, repair, and operation of any parking places for the use and benefit of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

31828.

If the board determines that the revenues from fees, charges, and rentals exceeds the amounts necessary for the proper maintenance, operation, repair and improvement of the parking places, and the acquisition of additional parking places, upon the order of the board the surplus revenue may be applied as a credit to each assessment in the proportion which the principal amount of each assessment bears to the total principal amount of all the assessments. The credit to each assessment, when added to all prior credits to that assessment, shall not exceed the principal amount of that assessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 302.)
-------------------------------------------

31829.

If the assessment has been paid in cash, the credit shall be returned in cash to the person who paid the corresponding assessment, upon his furnishing satisfactory evidence of such payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 302.)
-------------------------------------------

31830.

If the assessment is unpaid, the credit shall be applied upon the earliest unpaid installment or installments of principal and interest and any excess over the total principal and interest remaining unpaid shall be returned as provided in Section 31829.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 302.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Miscellaneous [31850. - 31866.5.]

31850.

The legislative body may sell or lease any property acquired for parking places which is not needed for that public use.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 426.)
-------------------------------------------

31851.

Any money received from the sale or lease of property not needed for parking places shall be placed in such fund as the board directs, and may be used for any purpose for which revenues from fees, charges, and rentals for the use of parking places of the district may be used, except the proceeds from the sale or lease of property acquired with the proceeds of an assessment shall not be applied as a credit upon any assessments except those levied for the acquisition of the property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 177.)
-------------------------------------------

31851.5.

Whenever the legislative body determines that any portion of property acquired for parking places is not needed for that public use, the city may devote such property to some other public use which the legislative body finds will be of general benefit to the area comprising the district. Before making such determination the legislative body shall hold a public hearing thereon and shall give notice of such hearing published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in a newspaper circulated in the city at least 10 days before such hearing. The notice shall contain a general description of the property as to which the determination is proposed to be made and shall contain a general description of the public use to which such property is proposed to be devoted. The determination shall not be made if prior to the hour fixed for the hearing, the owners of more than one-half of the area of the lands within the district have filed with the clerk of the legislative body written objection to the proposed determination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 177.)
-------------------------------------------

31852.

All real property shall be acquired or condemned in the name of the city, and title to such property shall be in the city, subject to the provisions of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

31853.

All contracts for the lease or purchase, or both, of real or personal property shall be made by the legislative body.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 396.)
-------------------------------------------

31854.

Whenever the board determines by resolution that the public interest and necessity and the needs of the district require that additional parking places be acquired for the district, it shall also determine whether property for the parking places be acquired by lease, by contracts with installment payments, by lease with option to purchase, by a lump sum payment, or pursuant to Section 31861. It shall designate the property to be so leased or acquired.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

31855.

When a certified copy of the resolution of the board is filed with the legislative body, it may proceed to acquire or lease the property pursuant to the resolution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 426.)
-------------------------------------------

31856.

Property for additional parking places may be acquired by any of the following means:

(a) By a lump sum payment or by contract of purchase with payments made annually, or otherwise, over a period of years, but that contract shall not provide for payments to be over a period longer than 25 years from the date of the contract. The purchase price may be paid from the limited taxes levied for acquisition of parking places under Section 31822, from revenues derived from operation of parking places of the district, or from any other funds of the district available for the purpose.

(b) By lease, but the lease shall not run for a period longer than 25 years. Rental on any lease may be paid from revenues derived from the operation of parking places of the district, from the limited taxes levied for maintenance, operation, repair, and improvement under Section 31822, or from any other funds of the district available for the purpose.

(c) Under lease and option to purchase but the lease and option shall not run for a longer period than 25 years. The purchase price may be provided from revenues derived from operation of parking places of the district, from the limited taxes levied for acquisition of parking places under Section 31822, or from any other funds of the district available for the purpose.

(d) Pursuant to Section 31861.

(e) Any contract of purchase, lease, or lease with option to purchase entered into pursuant to subdivision (a), (b), or (c) may contain agreements or covenants requiring levies pursuant to Section 31822, or requiring the fixing and collection of fees, charges, and rentals for the use of parking places of the district, or both, sufficient to produce funds from which the purchase price or rent shall be paid in accordance with the terms of the contract or lease.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 431.)
-------------------------------------------

31857.

Any lease or contract of purchase shall not bind the city to pay the rental or purchase price from funds other than those provided pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

31858.

Proceeds of taxes levied under Section 31822 for maintenance, operation, repair, and improvement may also be used for the maintenance, operation, repair, and improvement of any parking places held under lease or contract of purchase, or lease with option to purchase.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

31859.

At any time and with any city funds available for the purpose, the legislative body may acquire parking places which benefit the district and improve them. It may place the parking places under the control of the board of commissioners of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

31860.

At any time, either before or after the formation of the district, the legislative body may provide by ordinance that, for a period specified in the ordinance but not exceeding 25 years from its operative date, all or any specified amount, portion or percentage of revenues derived by the city from parking meters on streets within the district shall be used for the purposes specified in the ordinance which may include the acquisition, improvement, maintenance, repair, and operation of parking places for the use and benefit of the district. The purposes specified in the ordinance may also include the application of such revenues as a credit upon the levied assessments in the same manner as is provided in Sections 31828, 31829 and 31830. From the operative date of the ordinance such revenues shall for the period specified be placed in such fund or funds of the district as the board of commissioners specify and may be expended only for the purposes specified in the ordinance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 302.)
-------------------------------------------

31861.

Whenever the board of commissioners determines by resolution that additional parking places should be acquired and improved by assessment upon land in the district, a certified copy of the resolution shall be filed with the legislative body. The legislative body may thereafter proceed to acquire the additional parking places and provide for their improvement by a special assessment upon the land in the district as authorized by Section 31519.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 426.)
-------------------------------------------

31865.

As an alternative method of administration, upon request made to the legislative body by the owners of 50 percent of the assessed value of taxable land in each vehicle parking district created in the city, as shown by the last equalized county assessment roll, the parking places acquired and constructed for the use or benefit of the districts shall be managed, operated, and controlled by a commission appointed to have charge of all parking places in the city acquired pursuant to this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 426.)
-------------------------------------------

31866.

At any time following the formation of a district under this part and the levy of the initial assessment in such district, any parcel of land, whether contiguous or noncontiguous to the district, may be added to such district if the owner of such parcel files with the legislative body a petition for such inclusion and the legislative body grants such petition. The legislative body shall not grant such petition until the petition has been approved by the board of parking place commissioners of the district and until the street superintendent has estimated the amount which such parcel would have been assessed and taxed under all prior assessments and special ad valorem tax levies in the district if said parcel had been a part of said district when formed, and until the owner of such parcel has paid to the city such estimated amount. All such amounts paid to the city shall be placed in such fund as the board directs and may be used for any purpose for which revenues from fees, charges and rentals for the use of parking places of the district may be used. If such petition is granted, such parcel shall thereafter be entitled to the same rights as those which apply to other lands in the district and shall be subject to all assessments and special ad valorem taxes thereafter levied in said district under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1294.)
-------------------------------------------

31866.5.

As a condition to the granting of a petition for inclusion under Section 31866, the legislative body, with the approval of the board of parking place commissioners, may require that the owner pay to the city an amount in addition to the amount required by and computed under Section 31866, which additional amount shall not exceed an amount deemed by the legislative body to be reasonable in light of the elapse of time and changes in circumstances since the levy of prior assessments and special ad valorem tax levies. Such additional amount shall be placed in such fund as the board directs and may be used for the purposes specified in Section 31866.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 302.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Substitution of Other Lands, Property or Rights of Way for Those Previously Acquired [31900. - 31933.]

31900.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the following terms used in this chapter shall mean:

(a) “Substitution proceeding” means a proceeding taken under or pursuant to this chapter.

(b) “New property” means any or all of the following:

(1) Additional lands, property, and rights of way necessary or convenient for use as parking places for the benefit of the district; and

(2) Additional lands, property, and rights of way necessary or convenient for the opening, widening, straightening, or extending of streets or alleys necessary or convenient for ingress to or egress from any parking place.

(c) “Old property” means any or all of the following:

(1) Lands, property, and rights of way, or any portion thereof, theretofore acquired or acquired and improved pursuant to this part for use as parking places for the benefit of the district; and

(2) Lands, property, and rights of way, or any portion thereof, theretofore acquired or acquired and improved pursuant to this part for the opening, widening, straightening, or extending of streets or alleys necessary or convenient for ingress to or egress from any parking place.

(d) A “substitution” means the replacement of old property by new property.

(e) “District funds” means any unencumbered and available funds of the city received or collected for the use of the district, including moneys derived from taxes or other revenues pursuant to this part.

(f) “City funds” means any city funds, other than district funds, which are unencumbered and are available for use pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1168.)
-------------------------------------------

31910.

Substitution proceedings may be taken in the manner provided in this chapter if the legislative body determines that such substitution proceedings are necessary or desirable because of a change in circumstances.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 426.)
-------------------------------------------

31911.

Before adopting any resolution under Section 31913, the legislative body shall submit its proposed resolution to the board of parking place commissioners for the district and shall receive and consider the report and recommendation of the board thereon. After receiving such report and recommendation, the legislative body may either adopt the proposed resolution in its original form or as changed consistent with such report and recommendation. If the legislative body proposes to adopt the resolution in any other form, it shall again submit it to the board as provided in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1168.)
-------------------------------------------

31912.

The board shall make its report and recommendation within 30 days after the legislative body orders a proposed resolution submitted to the board, or within such further time as the legislative body may allow. If the board fails to make a report and recommendation within such time, the legislative body may adopt the resolution without receiving and considering a report and recommendation thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1168.)
-------------------------------------------

31913.

The legislative body may initiate a substitution proceeding by adopting a resolution proposing to order the making of a substitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1168.)
-------------------------------------------

31914.

The resolution proposing to order the making of a substitution shall contain:

(a) The number of the vehicle parking district and a reference to the ordinance fixing its exterior boundaries.

(b) A general description of the proposed substitution.

(c) An estimate of the current fair market value of the old property and an estimate of the current fair market value of the new property, together with the estimated cost of improvements, if any, proposed to be constructed on the new property for parking purposes.

(d) A time and place for the hearing of protests on the proposed substitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1168.)
-------------------------------------------

31915.

(a) Notice of hearing shall be by publication, posting, and mailing of the resolution proposing to order the making of a substitution.

(b) The resolution shall be published once a week for two successive weeks in a newspaper published in the city. The first publication shall be not less than 30 days prior to the date fixed for the hearing of protests. In cities where no newspaper is published, copies of the resolution shall be posted in three public places in the district at least 30 days before the date of hearing.

(c) Copies of the resolution headed “Notice of Parking District Substitution Proceedings” in letters at least one-half inch in height shall be posted upon all open streets within the proposed district. Notices shall be not more than 300 feet apart and shall be posted at least 30 days prior to the hearing.

(d) A copy of the resolution shall be mailed, postage prepaid, by the clerk of the legislative body to each person to whom land in the district is assessed as shown on the last equalized county assessment roll, at his address as shown upon the roll, and to any person, whether owner in fee or having a lien upon, or legal or equitable interest in, any land within the district, whose name and address and a designation of the land in which he is interested is on file in the office of the clerk.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 426.)
-------------------------------------------

31916.

Not later than the hour set for hearing, any interested person may file with the clerk of the legislative body written objection to the proposed substitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1168.)
-------------------------------------------

31917.

At the hearing all objections and protests shall be heard and considered. The hearing may be continued from time to time by order entered on the minutes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1168.)
-------------------------------------------

31918.

If at the hearing it appears that the owners of more than one-half of the area of the assessable land included within the district have made objection in writing to the proposed substitution as an entirety, the legislative body, by a resolution entered upon its minutes, shall so find. Thereafter the legislative body shall not proceed further with the substitution proceedings and said substitution proceedings are terminated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1168.)
-------------------------------------------

31919.

If the owners of more than one-half of the area of the assessable land included within the district have not made written objections or protests to the proposed substitution proceedings as an entirety, the legislative body may so find and proceed with the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1168.)
-------------------------------------------

31920.

Any protest or objection made pursuant to this chapter, or any signature to such objection or protest, may be withdrawn by a written withdrawal signed by the person or persons who signed the protest or objection or who affixed the signature to be withdrawn, and filed with the clerk at any time prior to the determination by the legislative body as to whether or not a majority protest exists. Any protest, objection, or signature withdrawn shall not be counted in computing a majority protest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1168.)
-------------------------------------------

31921.

Any objections or protests not made at the time and in the manner provided by this chapter are deemed waived voluntarily.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1168.)
-------------------------------------------

31922.

Except in the case of a majority protest, the legislative body may sustain or deny any or all objections and protests, and its determination is final. The determination of the legislative body shall be entered upon the minutes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1168.)
-------------------------------------------

31923.

Proceedings under this chapter shall not be attacked after the hearing upon any ground not stated in an objection or protest filed pursuant to this chapter. Any landowner or person interested in any land within the district is estopped to attack the proceedings upon any ground not stated in a protest filed by him pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1168.)
-------------------------------------------

31924.

At the hearing the legislative body may by resolution propose a modification of the substitution. Said resolution shall describe the proposed modification, shall specify a time for hearing thereon and shall be published once at least 15 days before the hearing in the same newspaper in which the resolution proposing to order the making of a substitution was published.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1168.)
-------------------------------------------

31925.

If at the conclusion of the hearing the legislative body by resolution adopted by four-fifths of all of its members shall find and determine (a) that public interest and convenience require the substitution, and (b) that all of the lands within the district will be benefited by the substituted acquisition or acquisition and improvement in substantially the same degree and in substantially the same proportion as said lands were benefited by the old property, said legislative body may then order the substitution either as described in the resolution proposing to order the making of a substitution, or as subsequently modified after proceedings pursuant to Section 31924.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1168.)
-------------------------------------------

31926.

After the adoption of the resolution ordering the making of the substitution and at such time as all the new property ordered to be acquired or to be acquired and improved shall have been acquired or acquired and improved by the city substantially in accordance with said resolution, the legislative body may thereupon adopt a resolution of implementation. At any time prior to the adoption of the resolution of implementation, the legislative body may abandon the substitution proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1168.)
-------------------------------------------

31927.

The resolution of implementation shall contain a general description of all new property acquired or acquired and improved under this chapter for the use and benefit of lands within the district. After the adoption of said resolution of implementation, all such new property shall be held by the city for the use and benefit of the district and shall be treated in all respects the same as lands, property and rights of way acquired under this part from moneys collected on account of any assessment levied or from the proceeds of any bonds issued hereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1168.)
-------------------------------------------

31928.

The resolution of implementation shall also contain a general description of all old property which is no longer to be held by the city for the use and benefit of the district. After the adoption of said resolution of implementation, any interest in or other right with respect to said old property which may have been acquired by or for any person (whether as a member of the public or as an owner of lands within the district) as a result of prior proceedings under this part shall be terminated. Where any of the old property consists of rights of way acquired under this part, any lands previously subject to any such rights of way shall be relieved and discharged therefrom, and title to said lands, unencumbered by said rights of way, shall be vested in such persons as may be entitled thereto by law. Title to all other portions of the old property, free and clear of the interests and rights aforesaid, shall be vested in the city and the city may hold, use or dispose of said lands or property in any manner provided or permitted by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1168.)
-------------------------------------------

31929.

Before adopting the resolution of implementation, payment or provision for payment shall be made for the unpaid balance of any outstanding and unpaid bond issued to represent the lien of an assessment upon any of the new property and any interest and penalties which are due thereon and are unpaid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1168.)
-------------------------------------------

31930.

Upon adoption of the resolution of implementation, any old property which is within the exterior boundaries of the district shall be deemed excluded from the district. Any old property so excluded may thereafter be added to the district pursuant to Section 31866.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1168.)
-------------------------------------------

31931.

The cost and expense of acquiring or acquiring and improving new property (including any amounts necessary to comply with Section 31929 and any amounts necessary to discharge any other lien or charge on said new property) shall be paid from district funds to the extent authorized by the board and the remainder, if any, from city funds. If for any reason the legislative body is unable or unwilling to appropriate from city funds the moneys needed for such purpose, the substitution proceedings shall be abandoned prior to the adoption of any resolution of implementation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1168.)
-------------------------------------------

31933.

No substitution proceedings pursuant to this chapter shall be initiated for the replacement of old property unless it has been used as a parking place or for ingress to or egress from a parking place for a period of not less than one year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1168.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. PARKING LAW OF 1949 [32500. - 33552.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [32500. - 32514.]

32500.
